Wisconsin, session 2025, SB819.
do enact as follows:SB819,11Section 1. 86.31 (1) (an) of the statutes is created to read:SB819,2,4286.31 (1) (an) “Designated facilitator” means the person designated under 3sub. (2) (k) 4. as the person from whom the county-level town road improvement 4committee receives project facilitation services.SB819,25Section 2. 86.31 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB819,2,9686.31 (1) (b) “Improvement” means a highway construction project with, 7regardless of the materials or construction methods used, that has a projected 8design life of at least 10 years or a feasibility study of such a highway construction 9project with a projected design life of at least 10 years.SB819,310Section 3. 86.31 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB819,3,21186.31 (1) (g) “Town highway improvement program district” means the towns 1located in the geographic area of a Wisconsin Towns Association District, as 2designated by the Wisconsin Towns Association.SB819,43Section 4. 86.31 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB819,3,11486.31 (2) (b) Except as provided in par. (d), improvements for highway 5construction projects funded under the program shall be under contracts. Such 6contracts shall be awarded on the basis of competitive bids and shall be awarded to 7the lowest responsible bidder. If a city or village does not receive a responsible bid 8for an improvement, the city or village may contract with a county for the 9improvement. Subject to pars. (hm) and (hw) and s. 59.52 (30), a town may contract 10with a county for the improvement subject to the criteria and procedures 11promulgated as rules under sub. (6) (h).SB819,512Section 5. 86.31 (2) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB819,3,161386.31 (2) (e) The department of transportation may not require as a condition 14of reimbursement that the design and construction of any improvement with 15eligible costs totaling $65,000 or less funded under sub. (3) be certified by a 16registered professional engineer.SB819,617Section 6. 86.31 (2) (h) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB819,3,191886.31 (2) (h) In determining whether a project has a projected design life of at 19least 10 years all of the following apply:SB819,3,22201. The department may not rely on any categorical determination or 21generalized assumption regarding the performance or useful life of any paving 22material or construction method.SB819,4,2232. The department may not determine that a project for which reimbursement 24is requested under this section has a projected design life of less than 10 years 1unless the determination is based on a review of the particular project by a 2registered professional engineer or county highway commissioner.SB819,73Section 7. 86.31 (2) (hm) of the statutes is created to read:SB819,4,8486.31 (2) (hm) If the department determines that a county has violated any 5provision under par. (hs) or that a county has contracted with a town for a town 6road improvement under this section without following the criteria and procedures 7under sub. (6) (h), the county may not contract with a town under sub. (6) (h) for 2 8years.SB819,89Section 8. 86.31 (2) (hs) of the statutes is created to read:SB819,4,101086.31 (2) (hs) No county may do any of the following:SB819,4,12111. Contract with a town for a town road improvement if the written and sealed 12estimate for that improvement was prepared by that county.SB819,4,14132. Prepare a written and sealed estimate for a town road improvement in 14another county.SB819,4,18153. Commence a town road improvement for a town unless the town has made 16the notification required by rule promulgated under sub. (6) (h) 2. and provided any 17bidder with 10 days to submit information on the accuracy of the written and sealed 18cost estimate prepared for the improvement.SB819,919Section 9. 86.31 (2) (i) of the statutes is created to read:SB819,4,222086.31 (2) (i) 1. No later than August 1 of each odd-numbered year, the 21department shall release application materials for projects under subs. (3), (3m) 22and (3s).SB819,5,2232. a. No later than November 15 of each odd-numbered year, each town that 24intends to apply for funding under sub. (3) shall provide completed project 1applications for improvements under sub. (3) to the designated facilitator of its 2county-level town road improvement committee.SB819,5,63b. No later than November 15 of each odd-numbered year, each town that 4intends to apply for funding under sub. (3m) or (3s) shall provide completed project 5applications for improvements under subs. (3m) and (3s) to the designated 6facilitator of its county-level town road improvement committee.SB819,5,973. a. No later than January 1 of each even-numbered year, each county-level 8town road improvement committee shall provide a list of improvements selected for 9funding under sub. (3) to its designated facilitator.SB819,5,1210b. No later than January 1 of each even-numbered year, each county-level 11town road improvement committee shall provide improvement rankings under par. 12(k) 3. for improvements under subs. (3m) and (3s) to its designated facilitator.SB819,5,1713c. Each county-level town road improvement committee shall provide 14improvement rankings under par. (k) 3. for improvements under subs. (3m) and (3s) 15to the regional town road improvement committee for the town highway 16improvement district in which the county-level town road improvement committee 17is located.SB819,5,20184. a. No later than January 15 of each even-numbered year, each designated 19facilitator shall provide completed applications for improvements to be funded 20under sub. (3) to the department.SB819,5,2321b. No later than January 15 of each even-numbered year, each designated 22facilitator shall provide completed applications for grants under subs. (3m) and (3s) 23to the department.SB819,6,4245. No later than February 1 of each even-numbered year, each regional town 1road improvement committee shall provide improvement rankings under par. (L) 2. 2for improvements under subs. (3m) and (3s) to the person designated as facilitator 3for the town highway improvement program district in which the regional town 4improvement district is located.SB819,6,756. No later than March 15 of each even-numbered year, the statewide town 6road improvement committee shall select improvements for funding under subs. 7(3m) and (3s).SB819,6,1087. a. No later than March 15 of each even-numbered year, each town shall 9enter into an agreement with the department regarding each improvement funded 10under sub. (3). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb819 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb819 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB819 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB819 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB819: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting